Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1001
Terms, defined.

For the purpose of sections 69-1001 to 69-1008, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Commercial hatchery shall mean a place where chicks are hatched for the purpose of resale or where chicks are hatched for hire; and

(2) Commercial chicks shall mean any domestic fowl produced in a commercial hatchery, under the age of six weeks or not to exceed one pound in weight, and which are offered for resale by the hatchery or owner of chicks.

Laws 1967, c. 414, § 1, p. 1279.